Utah statutes.
53A-6-303.    Nominations -- Appointment of commission members --
Reappointments.
(1) (a)  The board shall adopt rules establishing procedures for nominating
and appointing individuals to voting membership on UPPAC.
(b)  Nomination petitions must be filed with the state superintendent prior to
June 16 of the year of appointment.
(c)  A nominee for appointment as a member of UPPAC as an educator must have
been employed in the representative class in the Utah public school system or
a private school accredited by the board during the three years immediately
preceding the date of appointment.
(2)  The state superintendent of public instruction shall appoint the members
of the commission.
(3)  Appointments begin July 1 and are for terms of three years and until a
successor is appointed.
(4)  Terms of office are staggered so that approximately 1/3 of UPPAC members
are appointed annually.
(5)  A member may not serve more than two terms.
